Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB87.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 28, 1937 (P.L.955, No.265), referred to as the Housing Authorities Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 6.1. Training Requirement for Members of 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 Authority.--(a) The Department of Community and Economic Development shall establish and implement a mandatory training program for members of housing authorities. The training program shall be developed by the Department of Community and Economic Development in consultation with representatives of housing authorities, municipal officials, public housing residents, housing industry professional organizations or a Statewide housing association and relevant Federal and State agencies.(b) A member of an authority who is appointed after the effective date of this section shall satisfactorily complete the training program no later than one hundred eighty (180) days following the beginning of the term of office of the member.(c) An individual serving as a member of an authority on the effective date of this section shall satisfactorily complete the training program within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this section.(d) Following an initial or subsequent reappointment to an authority, a member shall complete the training program within one hundred eighty (180) days of the member's reappointment.(e) An authority may remove a member who does not complete the training program.(f) The course curriculum for the training program shall consist of a minimum of eight (8) hours of instruction delivered either in person, online, virtually or remotely, and shall include, at a minimum, information modules that encompass the following topics or areas:(1) Fair housing fundamentals and protections, reasonable accommodations and prevention of hate, harassment and discriminatory practices.(2) Fiscal management, budgeting and capital planning.20250SB0087PN0043 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Board governance best practices and fiduciary responsibilities.(4) Best practices relating to building code compliance, including the general inspection, maintenance and repair of housing units.(5) Strategies for crime prevention and drug elimination.(6) Ethics and open meetings, including the requirements under 65 Pa.C.S. Chs. 7 (relating to open meetings) and 11 (relating to ethics standards and financial disclosure).(7) The act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(8) Any other topic deemed appropriate by the Department of Community and Economic Development to enable a member of an authority to serve effectively.(g) The training program shall be made available by the Department of Community and Economic Development at no cost to an authority or its members.(h) The Department of Community and Economic Development shall use money appropriated by the General Assembly for the purpose of underwriting the cost of providing and administering the training program.(i) The Department of Community and Economic Development may partner or contract with a third-party entity to develop and to deliver the training program.(j) The Department of Community and Economic Development may approve alternative training programs that fulfill the requirements of this section which may be provided by an authority to its members at the authority's own expense.(k) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an authority from offering additional training programs or other 20250SB0087PN0043 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 learning activities in addition to the training program. The costs of any additional training programs or other learning activities may not be paid by the Department of Community and Economic Development . Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250SB0087PN0043 - 4 - 12345